Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska31-366
Injuring or obstructing ditch, drain, or watercourse; penalty.

If any person shall willfully obstruct or injure any ditch, drain, or watercourse, or damage or destroy any dike or other work constructed under the provisions of sections 31-301 to 31-369, he shall be liable to the drainage district for the full amount of the injury occasioned by the damage thereto, the same to be recovered by a civil action in the name of the district. In addition thereto he shall be deemed guilty of a misdemeanor, and upon conviction thereof shall be fined in any sum not exceeding the sum of one hundred dollars.

Laws 1905, c. 161, § 34, p. 634;

R.S.1913, § 1861;

C.S.1922, § 1808;

C.S.1929, § 31-465;

R.S.1943, § 31-366.